Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-2,105
Appeal.

Any person aggrieved by a decision made or an order issued by the Chief Water Officer pursuant to section 46-226.02, 46-233, 46-240, 46-241, 46-242, 46-297, or 46-2,101 may appeal as provided in section 61-207.

Laws 1983, LB 198, § 19;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 139;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 122.